src/noun-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON kudo-Misc_Pronouns_Indef
+Indef+Nom+Sg:0  kudo-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Indef+Abl:%>дО1 Clitic ;
+Indef+Gen:%>нь kal-Tenses1 ; 
+Indef+Dat:%>нень Clitic ;
+Indef+Ill:%>с Clitic ;
+Indef+Gen+Abl:%>нь%>стэ Clitic ;
+Indef+Gen+Ela:%>нь%>стэ Clitic ;
+Indef+Gen+Indef+Ine:%>нь%>сэ Clitic ;
+Indef+Gen+Indef+Ill:%>нь%>с Clitic ; 
+Indef+Gen+Indef+Abe:%>нь%>втО1мО1 Clitic ;
+Indef+Ine:%>сО1 Clitic ; 
+Indef+Ela:%>стО1 Clitic ;
+Indef+Prl:%>Г2а Clitic ;
+Indef+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Clitic ;
+Indef+Tra:%>ксЬ2 Clitic ;
+Indef+Comp:%>шка Clitic ; 


LEXICON Misc_Pronouns_Pl
+Pl+Indef+Nom:%>тЬ2 Clitic ;
+Pl+Def:%>тне Clitic ; 
+Pl+Def+Abl:%>тне%>де Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Abe:%>тне%>с Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Comp:%>тне%>шка Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Gen:%>тне%>нь Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Dat:%>тне%>нень Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Ill:%>тне%>с Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Ine:%>тне%>сэ Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Ela:%>тне%>стэ Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Tra:%>тне%>кс Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Prl:%>тне%>ва Clitic ;



LEXICON SecondaryDeclination
+Sg+Def+Nom:%>сь  Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Sg+Def+Gen:%>нть Clitic ;
+Sg+Def+Dat:%>нтень Clitic ;
+Prl+Sg+Def:%>Г2а SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+Abe+Sg+Def:%>втО1мО1 SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+Abl+Sg+Def:%>дО1 SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+Tra+Sg+Def:%>ксЬ2 SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+Ine+Sg+Def:%>сО1 SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+Ela+Sg+Def:%>стО1 SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+NoLV+Comp+Sg+Def:%>шка SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+LV+Tra+Sg+Def:%>V1ксЬ2 SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;

 Clitic ;
+Pl+Indef+Nom:%>тЬ2 Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Nom:%>тне Clitic ; 
+Pl+Def+Abl:%>тне%>де Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Abe:%>тне%>с Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Comp:%>тне%>шка Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Gen:%>тне%>нь Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Dat:%>тне%>нень Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Ill:%>тне%>с Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Ine:%>тне%>сэ Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Ela:%>тне%>стэ Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Tra:%>тне%>кс Clitic ;
+Pl+Def+Prl:%>тне%>ва Clitic ;


LEXICON SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx
+Sg+Def:%>нть Clitic ; 
 Clitic ; 

!!!



LEXICON lak-Nouns1-1
+N1+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: lak-Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1+Abs: lak-Tenses-Abs ;
+N1: Nouns_Voiceless ; 
+N1: Nouns1_A ;
 Mezty ;

LEXICON kal-Nouns1-1
+N1+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: kal-Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1+Abs: kal-Tenses-Abs ;
+N1: Nouns_Voiceless ; 
+N1: Nouns1_A ;
 Mezty ;

LEXICON kit-Nouns1-1
+N1+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: kit-Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1+Abs: kit-Tenses-Abs ;
+N1: Nouns_Voiceless ; 
+N1: Nouns1_A ;
 Mezty ;

LEXICON kudo-Nouns1-1
+N1+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: kudo-Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1+Abs: kudo-Tenses-Abs ;
+N1: Nouns_Voiceless ; 
+N1: Nouns1_A ;
 Mezty ;



!LEXICON Nouns1-1
!+N1+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: Tenses-NomSg ;
!+N1+Abs: Tenses-Abs ;
!+N1: Nouns_Voiceless ; 
!+N1: Nouns1_A ;
! Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns1S-1 
+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: osh-Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1S+Abs: osh-Tenses-Abs ;
+N1S: Nouns1S_A_ReqVow ;
+N1S: Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow ;
 Mezty ;



LEXICON Nouns1_A
 Possessive-NomGen ;

+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Abl:%>дО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Comp:%>О1шка kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Tra:%>О1кс osh-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Ill:%>О1з osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;

+TempCx+Sg+Indef:%>не Clitic ;
+TempCx+Pl+Indef:%>не Clitic ;
+Lat+Sg+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Lat+Pl+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;

+Dat+Sg+Indef:%>нень Clitic ;
+Dat+Sg+Px1Sg:%>нень Clitic ;
+Dat+Sg+Px2Sg:%>тень Clitic ;
+Dat+Sg+Px3:%>О1нстэнь Clitic ;
+Dat+Pl+Indef:%>нень Clitic ;
+Dat+Pl+Px1Sg:%>нень Clitic ;
+Dat+Pl+Px2Sg:%>тень Clitic ;
+Dat+Pl+Px3:%>О1нстэнь Clitic ;
+Nom+Sg+Def:%>О1сь osh-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Gen+Sg+Def:%>О1нть Clitic ;
+Dat+Sg+Def:%>О1нтень Clitic ;

+Gen+Sg+Indef:%>О1нь kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+Com+Sg+Indef:%>нек lak-Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Sg+Px2Sg:%>теть Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Sg+Px2Sg:%>те Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Sg+Px3:%>О1нстО1 Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Sg+Px2Pl:%>О1нстэнк lak-Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Sg+Px3Sg:%>О1нстэнзэ Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1нстэнст Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1нстэст Clitic ;
+Gen+Pl+Indef:%>О1нь kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+Com+Pl+Indef:%>нек lak-Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Pl+Px2Sg:%>теть Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Pl+Px2Sg:%>те Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Pl+Px3:%>О1нстО1 Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Pl+Px2Pl:%>О1нстэнк lak-Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Pl+Px3Sg:%>О1нстэнзэ Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1нстэнст Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1нстэст Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Ill+Sg:%>з osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Ill+Pl:%>з osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Nom+Sg+Px3Sg:%>зО1 kudo-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Nom+Sg+Px1Pl:%>нО1к lak-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Nom+Pl+Px1Pl:%>нО1к lak-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Gen+Sg+Px1Pl:%>нО1к lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Gen+Pl+Px1Pl:%>нО1к lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Nom+Sg+Def:%>сь osh-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Gen+Sg+Def:%>сть Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Sg+Def:%>стень Clitic ;


LEXICON Possessive-NomGen
+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg/м:%>О1м kal-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Dial+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg/м:%>О1м kal-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Px1Sg/м:%>О1м kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg/Н:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Px1Sg/Н:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px1Sg+KinGen:%>О1нь kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px2Sg+KinGen:%>О1ть kit-Tenses-Obl ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Sg:%>О1зО1 kudo-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+Nom+Sg+Px1Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Nom+Pl+Px1Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Px1Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+Dial+Nom+Sg+Px1Pl:%>О1мО1к lak-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Tenses-Obl ;



!!!!!!!!Nouns1S_A
!HERE
LEXICON Nouns1S_A_ReqVow
 Possessive-NomGen ;

+Ine:%>О1сО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Ela:%>О1стО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Comp:%>О1шка kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Ill:%>О1с Clitic ;

+Lat+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;


+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Comp:%>шка kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Tra:%>О1кс osh-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Ill:%>с Clitic ;

+Use/Sub/Dial+Gen+Sg+Def:%>О1сть Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Sg+Def:%>О1стень Clitic ;
+Dat+Px3:%>О1нстэнь Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px3:%>О1нстО1 Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px3Sg:%>О1нстэнзэ Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px3Pl:%>О1нстэнст Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px3Pl:%>О1нстэст Clitic ;


+Nom+Sg+Def:%>О1сь osh-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Gen+Sg+Def:%>О1нть Clitic ;
+Dat+Sg+Def:%>О1нтень Clitic ;
+Gen+Indef:%>О1нь kal-Tenses-Obl ;



LEXICON Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow
+Abl:%>дО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px2Sg:%>теть Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px2Sg:%>те Clitic ;
+Dat+Px2Sg:%>тень Clitic ;
+Dat+Px1Sg:%>нень Clitic ;


+Dat:%>нень Clitic ;
+Com:%>нек lak-Clitic ;
+TempCx:%>не Clitic ;
!!This one would render voiceless "s"
+Use/Sub/Dial+Ill:%>з osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Sg+Nom+Px3Sg:%>зО1 kudo-Tenses-NomSg ;
Nouns_Pl ;




!!!!!!!!Nouns2_A
LEXICON Nouns2-a
 Possessive-NomGen ;

+Dat+Px1Sg:%>нень Clitic ;
+Dat+Px2Sg:%>тень Clitic ;
+Dat:%>нень Clitic ;
+Com:%>нек lak-Clitic ;
+TempCx:%>не Clitic ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Abl:%>дО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Comp:%>О1шка kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Tra:%>О1кс osh-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

+Lat+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Ill:%>О1з osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;
+Dat+Px3Sg:%>О1нстэнь Clitic ;
+Dat+Px3Pl:%>О1нстэнь Clitic ;

+Nom+Sg+Def:%>О1сь osh-Tenses-NomSg ;
+Gen+Sg+Def:%>О1нть Clitic ;
+Dat+Sg+Def:%>О1нтень Clitic ;
+Gen+Indef:%>О1нь kal-Tenses-Obl ;

+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px2Sg:%>теть Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px2Sg:%>те Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px3:%>О1нстО1 Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px3Sg:%>О1нстэнзэ Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px3Pl:%>О1нстэнст Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Dat+Px3Pl:%>О1нстэст Clitic ;


LEXICON istja-Gen-Attributes
 Clitic ; !This means that stem is word final !!!
+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 Clitic ;
+Indef+GenIndef:%>нь kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+OrthOld+GenIndef+Der/Dem:%>нсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+OrthMorph+GenIndef+Der/Dem:%>ньсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+OrthPhon+GenIndef+Der/Dem:%>нце kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;


LEXICON chop-Gen-Attributes
 pek-Gen-Attributes ;

LEXICON pek-Gen-Attributes
 Clitic ; !This means that stem is word final !!!
+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 Clitic ;
+Indef+GenIndef:%>О1нь kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+OrthOld+GenIndef+Der/Dem:%>О1нсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+OrthMorph+GenIndef+Der/Dem:%>О1ньсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+OrthPhon+GenIndef+Der/Dem:%>О1нце kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON Possessives2-Ill
 Possessives2 ;
+NoVowX+Ill:%>з osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;

LEXICON Possessives2
+Use/Sub/Dial+Px1Sg/м:%>О1м kal-Determinatives1 ;
+Px1Sg/Н+NonNomSg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Determinatives1 ;
+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Determinatives1 ;
+Px3Sg+NonNomSg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Determinatives1 ;
+Px1Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Determinatives1 ;
+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Determinatives1 ;
+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Determinatives1 ;
+Px3Pl:%>О1нст kit-Determinatives1 ;

! These are possessor Indices for non-nominative singular
! +NonNomSg
LEXICON osh-Possessives2
+Dial+Px1Sg/м:%>О1м kal-Determinatives1 ;
+Px1Sg/Н+NonNomSg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Determinatives1 ;
+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Determinatives1 ;
+Px3Sg+NonNomSg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Determinatives1 ;
+Px1Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Determinatives1 ;
+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Determinatives1 ;
+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Determinatives1 ;
+Px3Pl:%>О1нст kit-Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON kudo-Possessives2
+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>м kal-Determinatives1 ;
+Px1Sg:%>нЬ2 kal-Determinatives1 ;
+Px2Sg:%>тЬ2 kit-Determinatives1 ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Px2Sg:%>нтЬ2 kit-Determinatives1 ;
+Px3Sg:%>нзО1 kudo-Determinatives1 ;
+Px1Pl:%>нО1к lak-Determinatives1 ;
+Px2Pl:%>нк lak-Determinatives1 ;
+Px3Pl:%>ст kit-Determinatives1 ;
+Px3Pl+Use/Sub/Dial:%>нст kit-Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON kal-Determinatives1
+Der/Dem:%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+OrthPhon+Der/Dem:%>це kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
 kal-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON kit-Determinatives1
+Der/Dem:%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+OrthPhon+Der/Dem:%>це kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
 kit-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON lak-Determinatives1
+Der/Dem:%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+OrthPhon+Der/Dem:%>це kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
 lak-Tenses-Obl ;


LEXICON kudo-Determinatives1
+Der/Dem:%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+OrthPhon+Der/Dem:%>це kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
 kudo-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON DemTag
+Der/Dem: Clitic ; 

LEXICON alce-Dem 
+Spat+Der/Dem: kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;

LEXICON letter-F ! this needs fixing front vowel
+Prop:%- kudo-PROP ;

LEXICON letter-B ! this needs fixing back vowel
+Prop:%- kudo-PROP ;

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    kudo-PROP ;
:%: kudo-PROP ;
:%- kudo-PROP ;
:%' kudo-PROP ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!POSSESSIVE marking followed by clitics!!!

LEXICON osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic 
 Clitic ;
 osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;

LEXICON kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic 
 Clitic ;
 kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;


LEXICON osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic
+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 Clitic ;
+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м Clitic ;
+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 Clitic ;
+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 Clitic ;
+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 Clitic ;
+Px1Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Clitic ;
+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Clitic ;
+Px3Pl:%>О1ст Clitic ;

LEXICON kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic
+Px1Sg:%>нЬ2 Clitic ;
+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>м Clitic ;
+Px2Sg:%>тЬ2 Clitic ;
+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>нтЬ2 Clitic ;
+Px3Sg:%>нзО1 Clitic ;
+Px1Pl:%>нО1к lak-Clitic ;
+Px2Pl:%>нк lak-Clitic ;
+Px3Pl:%>ст Clitic ;


LEXICON kudo-Possessive-Word-Final
+Px1Sg:%>нЬ2 # ;
+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>м # ;
+Px2Sg:%>тЬ2 # ;
+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>нтЬ2 # ;
+Px3Sg:%>нзО1 # ;
+Px1Pl:%>нО1к # ;
+Px2Pl:%>нк # ;
+Px3Pl:%>ст # ;
+Px3Pl:%>нст # ;
!! Used with words like тензэ
